fr: Norme d'homologation des gilets de sauvetage: CAA (Royaume-Uni); CAAC (Chine); CASA (Australie); EASA (Union européenne); FAA (États-Unis); OMI/SOLAS; Norme ISO; Transports Canada; Approbation USCG; Autre
sk-SK: Schvaľovacia norma záchrannej vesty: CAA (Spojené kráľovstvo); CAAC (Čína); CASA (Austrália); EASA (Európska únia); FAA (USA); IMO/SOLAS; Norma ISO; Transport Canada; Schválenie USCG; Iné
zh-CN: 救生衣认可标准: CAA（英国）; CAAC（中国）; CASA（澳大利亚）; EASA（欧盟）; FAA（美国）; IMO/SOLAS; ISO 标准; 加拿大交通部; USCG 批准; 其他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận của áo phao cứu sinh: CAA (Vương quốc Anh); CAAC (Trung Quốc); CASA (Úc); EASA (Liên minh Châu Âu); FAA (Hoa Kỳ); IMO/SOLAS; Tiêu chuẩn ISO; Transport Canada; Chứng nhận USCG; Khác
el: Πρότυπο έγκρισης σωσίβιου γιλέκου: CAA (Ηνωμένο Βασίλειο); CAAC (Κίνα); CASA (Αυστραλία); EASA (Ευρωπαϊκή Ένωση); FAA (Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες); IMO/SOLAS; Πρότυπο ISO; Transport Canada; Έγκριση USCG; Άλλο
pt-BR: Norma de homologação do colete salva-vidas: CAA (Reino Unido); CAAC (China); CASA (Austrália); EASA (União Europeia); FAA (Estados Unidos); IMO/SOLAS; Padrão ISO; Transport Canada; Aprovação da USCG; Outro
nl: Goedkeuringsnorm reddingsvesten: CAA (Verenigd Koninkrijk); CAAC (China); CASA (Australië); EASA (Europese Unie); FAA (Verenigde Staten); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-standaard; Transport Canada; USCG-goedkeuring; Overige
fi: Pelastusliivin hyväksyntästandardi: CAA (Iso-Britannia); CAAC (Kiina); CASA (Australia); EASA (Euroopan unioni); FAA (Yhdysvallat); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-standardi; Transport Canada; USCG-hyväksyntä; Muu
sl-SI: Standard odobritve za rešilne jopiče: CAA (Združeno kraljestvo); CAAC (Kitajska); CASA (Avstralija); EASA (Evropska unija); FAA (Združene države); IMO/SOLAS; Standard ISO; Transport Canada; Odobritev USCG; Drugo
ja: ライフジャケット承認標準: CAA (イギリス); CAAC (中国); CASA (オーストラリア); EASA (欧州連合); FAA (米国); IMO/SOLAS; ISO規格; カナダ運輸省; USCG承認; その他
de: Normstandard für Rettungswesten: CAA (Vereinigtes Königreich); CAAC (China); CASA (Australien); EASA (Europäische Union); FAA (Vereinigte Staaten); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-Standard; Transport Canada; USCG-Zulassung; Sonstige
nb: Godkjenningsstandard for livvest: CAA (Storbritannia); CAAC (Kina); CASA (Australia); EASA (EU); FAA (USA); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-standard; Transport Canada; USCG-godkjenning; Annet
bg-BG: Стандарт за одобрение на спасителна жилетка: CAA (Обединено кралство); CAAC (Китай); CASA (Австралия); EASA (Европейски съюз); FAA (САЩ); IMO/SOLAS; ISO стандарт; Transport Canada; Одобрен от USCG; Друг
th: มาตรฐานการอนุมัติเสื้อชูชีพ: CAA (สหราชอาณาจักร); CAAC (จีน); CASA (ออสเตรเลีย); EASA (สหภาพยุโรป); FAA (สหรัฐอเมริกา); IMO/SOLAS; มาตรฐาน ISO; Transport Canada; การรับรองโดย USCG; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Gelbėjimosi liemenių patvirtinimo standartas: CAA (Jungtinė Karalystė); CAAC (Kinija); CASA (Australija); EASA (Europos Sąjunga); FAA (JAV); IMO / SOLAS; ISO standartas; „Transport Canada“; USCG patvirtinimas; Kita
hu: Mentőmellény jóváhagyási szabványa: CAA (Egyesült Királyság); CAAC (Kína); CASA (Ausztrália); EASA (Európai Unió); FAA (Egyesült Államok); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-szabvány; Transport Canada; USCG jóváhagyás; Egyéb
it: Standard di approvazione del giubbotto di salvataggio: CAA (Regno Unito); CAAC (Cina); CASA (Australia); EASA (Unione Europea); FAA (Stati Uniti); IMO/SOLAS; Standard ISO; Transport Canada; Approvazione USCG; Altro
ro-RO: Standard de omologare a vestei de salvare: CAA (Regatul Unit); CAAC (China); CASA (Australia); EASA (Uniunea Europeană); FAA (Statele Unite); IMO/SOLAS; Standard ISO; Transport Canada; Aprobare USCG; Altele
sv: Godkännandestandard för flytväst: CAA (Storbritannien); CAAC (Kina); CASA (Australien); EASA (Europeiska unionen); FAA (USA); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-standard; Transport Canada; USCG-godkännande; Övrigt
pt-PT: Norma de aprovação do colete salva-vidas: CAA (Reino Unido); CAAC (China); CASA (Austrália); EASA (União Europeia); FAA (Estados Unidos); IMO/SOLAS; Norma ISO; Transport Canada; Aprovação da USCG; Outro
es: Estándar de aprobación del chaleco salvavidas: CAA (Reino Unido); CAAC (China); CASA (Australia); EASA (Unión Europea); FAA (Estados Unidos); IMO/SOLAS; Norma ISO; Transport Canada; Aprobación de la USCG; Otro
ko: 구명조끼 승인 표준: CAA(영국); CAAC(중국); CASA(호주); EASA(유럽 연합); FAA(미국); IMO/SOLAS; ISO 표준; Transport Canada; USCG 승인; 기타
pl: Norma zatwierdzenia kamizelki ratunkowej: CAA (Wielka Brytania); CAAC (Chiny); CASA (Australia); EASA (Unia Europejska); FAA (Stany Zjednoczone); IMO/SOLAS; Standard ISO; Transport Canada; Zatwierdzenie USCG; Inne
cs: Norma pro schvalování záchranných vest: CAA (Spojené království); CAAC (Čína); CASA (Austrálie); EASA (Evropská unie); FAA (Spojené státy); IMO/SOLAS; Norma ISO; Transport Canada; Schválení USCG; Jiné
zh-TW: 救生背心核准標準: 民航局 (CAA) (英國); 中國民用航空局 (CAAC) (中國); 民航安全局 (CASA) (澳洲); 歐洲航空安全局 (EASA) (歐盟); 聯邦航空總署 (FAA) (美國); IMO/SOLAS; ISO 標準; 加拿大交通部; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 核准; 其他
hr-HR: Standard odobrenja prsluka za spašavanje: CAA (Ujedinjeno Kraljevstvo); CAAC (Kina); CASA (Australija); EASA (Europska unija); FAA (Sjedinjene Američke Države); IMO/SOLAS; ISO standard; Transport Canada; USCG odobrenje; Ostalo
da: Standard for godkendelse af redningsveste: CAA (Storbritannien); CAAC (Kina); CASA (Australien); EASA (EU); FAA (USA); IMO/SOLAS; ISO-standard; Transport Canada; USCG-godkendelse; Andet
tr: Can yeleği onay standardı: CAA (Birleşik Krallık); CAAC (Çin); CASA (Avustralya); EASA (Avrupa Birliği); FAA (Amerika Birleşik Devletleri); IMO/SOLAS; ISO standardı; Transport Canada; USCG onayı; Diğer
ru: Стандарт одобрения спасательного жилета: CAA (Великобритания); CAAC (Китай); CASA (Австралия); EASA (Евросоюз); FAA (США); IMO/SOLAS; Стандарт ISO; Transport Canada; Одобрено USCG; Другое
en: Life vest approval standard: CAA (United Kingdom); CAAC (China); CASA (Australia); EASA (European Union); FAA (United States); IMO/SOLAS; ISO standard; Transport Canada; USCG approval; Other